Washington statutes.
RCW 44.05.050

Members—Persons ineligible to serve.

No person may serve on the commission who:

(1) Is not a registered voter of the state at the time of selection; or

(2) Is or has within one year prior to selection been a registered lobbyist; or

(3) Is or has within two years prior to selection been an elected official or elected legislative district, county, or state party officer. The provisions of this subsection do not apply to the office of precinct committeeperson.

[ 1984 c 13 s 2; 1983 c 16 s 5.]